Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1891.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6111(b)(1), (1.1)(i) and (6) and (f)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection SUBSECTIONS to read:§ 6111. Sale or transfer of firearms.* * *(b) Duty of seller.--No licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall sell or deliver any firearm to another person, other than a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer, licensed dealer or licensed collector, until the conditions of subsection (a) have been satisfied and until he has:<--<--1234567891011121314151617 (1) [For purposes of a firearm as defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions), obtained a completed application/record of sale from the potential buyer or transferee to be filled out in triplicate, the original copy to be sent to the Pennsylvania State Police, postmarked via first class mail, within 14 days of the sale, one copy to be retained by the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer for a period of 20 years and one copy to be provided to the purchaser or transferee. The form of this application/record of sale shall be no more than one page in length and shall be promulgated by the Pennsylvania State Police and provided by the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer. The application/record of sale shall include the name, address, birthdate, gender, race, physical description and Social Security number of the purchaser or transferee, the date of the application and the caliber, length of barrel, make, model and manufacturer's number of the firearm to be purchased or transferred. The application/record of sale shall also contain the following question:Are you the actual buyer of the firearm(s), as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions), listed on this application/record of sale? Warning: You are not the actual buyer if you are acquiring the firearm(s) on behalf of another person, unless you are legitimately acquiring the firearm as a gift for any of the following individuals who are legally eligible to own a firearm:(1) spouse;(2) parent;(3) child;20250HB1891PN2594 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) grandparent; or(5) grandchild.] For purposes of a firearm as defined in section 6102 (relating to definitions), obtained a completed application/record of sale from the potential buyer or transferee. The following shall apply:(i) A licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer exempted under subsection (k) may complete an application/record of sale in paper format which shall be filled out in triplicate, with the original copy to be sent to the Pennsylvania State Police, postmarked via first class mail, within 14 days of the sale.(ii) A licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer not exempted under subsection (k) shall complete an electronic application/record of sale at the time of transfer. A licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer exempted under subsection (k) who chooses not to complete an application/record of sale in paper format must complete an electronic application/record of sale at the time of transfer. A completed electronic application/record of sale shall be transmitted to the Pennsylvania State Police.(iii) A copy of the application/record of sale shall be retained either in electronic or paper format by the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer for a period of 20 years and a copy shall be provided to the purchaser or transferee in electronic or paper format.(iv) The application/record of sale shall be no more than one page in length and shall be promulgated by the 20250HB1891PN2594 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania State Police and provided by the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer. The application/record of sale shall include the name, address, birth date, gender, race, physical description and Social Security number of the purchaser or transferee, the date of the application and the caliber, length of barrel, make, model and manufacturer's number of the firearm to be purchased or transferred. The application/record of sale shall also contain the following question:Are you the actual buyer of the firearm(s), as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions), listed on this application/record of sale? Warning: You are not the actual buyer if you are acquiring the firearm(s) on behalf of another person, unless you are legitimately acquiring the firearm as a gift for any of the following individuals who are legally eligible to own a firearm:(1) spouse;(2) parent;(3) child;(4) grandparent; or(5) grandchild.(v) In the event of an electronic failure under section 6111.1(b)(2) (relating to Pennsylvania State Police) that affects the electronic application/record of sale and upon notice from the Pennsylvania State Police, a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall proceed as if exempted under subsection (k) 20250HB1891PN2594 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and shall obtain a completed application/record of sale, in paper format, from the potential buyer or transferee. A licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall proceed with the application/record of sale as prescribed in subparagraphs (i) and (iii) until notified by the Pennsylvania State Police that the electronic failure no longer remains.(1.1) On the date of publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of a notice by the Pennsylvania State Police that the instantaneous records check has been implemented, all of the following shall apply:(i) In the event of an electronic failure under section 6111.1(b)(2) [(relating to Pennsylvania State Police)] for purposes of a firearm which exceeds the barrel and related lengths set forth in section 6102, [obtained] a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer shall obtain a completed application/record of sale in paper form from the potential buyer or transferee to be filled out in triplicate, the original copy to be sent to the Pennsylvania State Police, postmarked via first class mail, within 14 days of sale, one copy to be retained by the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer for a period of 20 years and one copy to be provided to the purchaser or transferee.* * *(6) Unless it has been discovered pursuant to a criminal history, juvenile delinquency and mental health records background check that the potential purchaser or transferee is prohibited from possessing a firearm pursuant to section 20250HB1891PN2594 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 6105, no information received [via telephone following the implementation of] by the instantaneous background check system from a purchaser or transferee who has received a unique approval number shall be retained by the Pennsylvania State Police.* * *(f) Application of section.--* * *(2) The provisions contained in subsections (a) [and], (c) and (k) shall only apply to pistols or revolvers with a barrel length of less than 15 inches, any shotgun with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, any rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches or any firearm with an overall length of less than 26 inches.* * *(k) Electronic reporting exemption.--A licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer who conducts 20 or fewer firearm sales and transfers per year shall not be required to use an electronic application/record of sale. The following shall apply:(1) Beginning in 2027, the Pennsylvania State Police shall conduct an annual review of the transactions of each licensed importer, licensed manufacturer and licensed dealer over the past calendar year to determine whether the licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer is exempted from the use of an electronic application/record of sale. The Pennsylvania State Police shall notify each licensed importer, licensed manufacturer and licensed dealer of an exemption to the use of an electronic application/record of sale no later than April 1 of each 20250HB1891PN2594 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 year.(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a licensed importer, licensed manufacturer or licensed dealer from choosing to use an electronic application/record of sale.(L) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ALLOW A GOVERNMENT OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR AN AGENT OF A GOVERNMENT OR LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY TO CREATE, MAINTAIN OR OPERATE A REGISTRY OF FIREARM OWNERSHIP WITHIN THIS COMMONWEALTH.Section 2. This act shall take effect April 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1891PN2594 - 7 - <--123456789101112